Vermont statutes. Title 7 Alcoholic Beverages, Cannabis, and Tobacco
Subchapter 3. Licenses

§ 901.
General provisions.

Except as otherwise permitted by law, a person shall not engage in the cultivation, preparation, processing, packaging, transportation, testing, or sale of cannabis or cannabis products without obtaining a license from the Board.

All licenses shall be valid for one year and expire at midnight on the eve of the anniversary of the date the license was issued. A licensee may apply to renew the license annually.

Applications for licenses and renewals shall be submitted on forms provided by the Board and shall be accompanied by the fees provided for in section 910 of this title.

There shall be six types of licenses available:
(d) (1) There shall be six types of licenses available:

a cultivator license;

a wholesaler license;

a product manufacturer license;

a retailer license;

a testing laboratory license; and

an integrated license.

The Board shall develop tiers for:
(2) (A) The Board shall develop tiers for:

cultivator licenses based on the plant canopy size of the cultivation operation or plant count for breeding stock; and

retailer licenses.

The Board may develop tiers for other types of licenses.

Except as provided in subdivision (B) of this subdivision (3), an applicant and its affiliates may obtain a maximum of one type of each type of license as provided in subdivisions (1)(A)-(E) of this subsection (d). Each license shall permit only one location of the establishment.
(3) (A) Except as provided in subdivision (B) of this subdivision (3), an applicant and its affiliates may obtain a maximum of one type of each type of license as provided in subdivisions (1)(A)-(E) of this subsection (d). Each license shall permit only one location of the establishment.

An applicant and its affiliates that are a dispensary registered pursuant to 18 V.S.A. chapter 86 may obtain one integrated license provided in subdivision (1)(F) of this subsection (d) or a maximum of one of each type of license provided in subdivisions (1)(A)-(E) of this subsection (d). An integrated licensee may not hold a separate cultivator, wholesaler, product manufacturer, retailer, or testing laboratory license. An integrated license shall permit only one location for each of the types of activities permitted by the license: cultivation, wholesale operations, product manufacturing, retail sales, and testing.

A dispensary that obtains a retailer license or an integrated license pursuant to this chapter shall maintain the dispensary and retail operations in a manner that protects patient and caregiver privacy in accordance with rules adopted by the Board.

Each licensee shall obtain and maintain commercial general liability insurance in accordance with rules adopted by the Board. Failure to provide proof of insurance to the Board, as required, may result in revocation of the license.

All licenses may be renewed according to procedures adopted through rulemaking by the Board.

The following records shall be exempt from public inspection and copying under the Public Records Act and shall be confidential:
(h) (1) The following records shall be exempt from public inspection and copying under the Public Records Act and shall be confidential:

any record in an application for a license relating to security, public safety, transportation, or trade secrets, including information provided in an operating plan pursuant to subdivision 881(a)(1)(B) of this title; and

any licensee record relating to security, public safety, transportation, trade secrets, or employees.

Notwithstanding

1 V.S.A. § 317(e)

, the Public Records Act exemption created in this subsection shall continue in effect and shall not be repealed through operation of

1 V.S.A. § 317(e)

.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. Oct. 7, 2020;

2021, No. 86

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, effective March 25, 2022.

§ 902.
License qualifications and application process.

An applicant, principal of an applicant, and person who owns or controls an applicant, who is a natural person:

shall be 21 years of age or older; and

shall consent to the release of his or her criminal and administrative history records.

As part of the application process, each applicant shall submit, in a format prescribed by the Board, an operating plan. The Board shall adopt rules regarding the required components of an application for each type of license.

The Board shall obtain a fingerprint-based Vermont criminal history record, an out-of-state criminal history record, a criminal history record from the Federal Bureau of Investigation, and any regulatory records relating to the operation of a business in this State or any other jurisdiction for each of the following who is a natural person:

the applicant;

each proposed principal; and

each individual who would control the business.

An applicant who is denied a license may appeal the Board’s determination in accordance with section 847 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. Oct. 7, 2020.

§ 903.
Priorities; business and technical assistance.

The Board shall issue licenses pursuant to this chapter as determined according to a system of priorities adopted by rule by the Board. The system of priorities shall require consideration of criteria, including:

whether the applicants have an existing medical cannabis dispensary license in good standing;

whether the applicants would foster social justice and equity in the cannabis industry by being a minority or women-owned business;

whether the applicants propose specific plans to recruit, hire, and implement a development ladder for minorities, women, or individuals who have historically been disproportionately impacted by cannabis prohibition;

whether applicants propose specific plans to pay employees a living wage and offer benefits;

whether the project incorporates principles of environmental resiliency or sustainability, including energy efficiency; and

the geographic distribution of cannabis establishments based on population and market needs.

The Agency of Commerce and Community Development, in collaboration with the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets, shall provide business and technical assistance to Vermont applicants with priority for services based on criteria adopted by the Board in accordance with subsection (a) of this section.

No later than September 1, 2021, the Board shall begin working with the Department of Labor, Agency of Commerce and Community Development, the Department of Corrections, and the Director of Racial Equity to develop outreach, training, and employment programs focused on providing economic opportunities to individuals who historically have been disproportionately impacted by cannabis prohibition.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. Oct. 7, 2020.

§ 904.
Cultivator license.

A cultivator licensed under this chapter may cultivate, process, package, label, transport, test, and sell cannabis to a licensed wholesaler, product manufacturer, retailer, integrated licensee, and dispensary and may purchase and sell cannabis seeds and clones to another licensed cultivator.

Cultivation of cannabis shall occur only in an enclosed, locked facility.

Representative samples of each lot or batch of cannabis intended for human consumption shall be tested for safety and potency in accordance with rules adopted by the Board.

Each cultivator shall create packaging for its cannabis.

Packaging shall include:

The name and registration number of the cultivator.

The strain and variety of cannabis contained.

The potency of the cannabis represented by the amount of tetrahydrocannabinol and cannabidiol in milligrams total and per serving.

A “produced on” date reflecting the date that the cultivator finished producing the cannabis.

Appropriate warnings as prescribed by the Board in rule.

Any additional requirements contained in rules adopted by the Board in accordance with this chapter. Rules shall take into consideration that different labeling requirements may be appropriate depending on whether the cannabis is sold to a wholesaler, product manufacturer, or retailer.

Packaging shall not be designed to appeal to persons under 21 years of age.

Only unadulterated cannabis shall be offered for sale. If, upon inspection, the Board finds any violative pesticide residue or other contaminants of concern, the Board shall order the cannabis, either individually or in blocks, to be:
(e) (1) Only unadulterated cannabis shall be offered for sale. If, upon inspection, the Board finds any violative pesticide residue or other contaminants of concern, the Board shall order the cannabis, either individually or in blocks, to be:

put on stop-sale;

treated in a particular manner; or

destroyed according to the Board’s instructions.

Cannabis ordered destroyed or placed on stop-sale shall be clearly separable from salable cannabis. Any order shall be confirmed in writing within seven days. The order shall include the reason for action, a description of the cannabis affected, and any recommended treatment.

A person may appeal an order issued pursuant to this section within 15 days after receiving the order. The appeal shall be made in writing and in accordance with section 847 of this title and shall clearly identify the cannabis affected and the basis for the appeal.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. Oct. 7, 2020;

2021, No. 86

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, effective March 25, 2022.

§ 904a.
Small cultivators.

It is the intent of the General Assembly to move as much of the illegal cannabis market as possible into the regulated market for the purposes of consumer protection and public safety. It is also the intent of the General Assembly to encourage participation in the regulated cannabis market by small, local farmers. In furtherance of these goals, the Board shall consider policies to promote small cultivators as defined in section 861 of this title.

The application for small cultivator licenses shall be prioritized over larger cultivation licenses during the initial application period.

In accordance with subdivision 881(a)(2)(B) of this chapter, the Board shall consider the different needs and risks of small cultivators when adopting rules and shall make an exception or accommodation to such rules for cultivators of this size where appropriate, provided that the rules shall not provide for an exception or accommodation to the requirements of section 869 of this title.

Upon licensing, a small cultivator may sell cannabis to a licensed dispensary at any time for sale to patients and caregivers pursuant to the dispensary license or to the public pursuant to an integrated license, including the time period before retail sales are permitted for licensed cannabis retailers.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. Oct. 7, 2020.

§ 905.
Wholesaler license.

A wholesaler licensed under this chapter may:

purchase cannabis from a licensed cultivator and integrated licensee, and cannabis products from a licensed product manufacturer, integrated licensee, and dispensary; and

transport, process, package, and sell cannabis and cannabis products to a licensed product manufacturer, retailer, integrated licensee, and dispensary.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. Oct. 7, 2020.

§ 906.
Product manufacturer license.

A product manufacturer licensed under this chapter may:

purchase cannabis from a licensed cultivator, wholesalers, or integrated licensee, and cannabis products from a licensed wholesaler, product manufacturer, integrated licensee, and dispensary;

use cannabis and cannabis products to produce cannabis products; and

transport, process, package, and sell cannabis products to a licensed wholesaler, product manufacturer, retailer, integrated licensee, and dispensary.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. Oct. 7, 2020.

§ 907.
Retailer license.

A retailer licensed under this chapter may:

purchase cannabis from a licensed cultivator, wholesaler, or integrated licensee, and cannabis products from a licensed wholesaler, product manufacturer, integrated licensee, and dispensary; and

transport, possess, and sell cannabis and cannabis products to the public for consumption off the registered premises or for cultivation.

In a single transaction, a retailer may provide one ounce of cannabis or the equivalent in cannabis products, or a combination thereof, to a person 21 years of age or older upon verification of a valid government-issued photograph identification card.

Packaging shall include:
(c) (1) Packaging shall include:

the strain and variety of cannabis contained;

the potency of the cannabis represented by the amount of tetrahydrocannabinol and cannabidiol in milligrams total and per serving;

a “produced on” date reflecting the date that the cultivator finished producing the cannabis;

appropriate warnings as prescribed by the Board in rule; and

any additional requirements contained in rules adopted by the Board in accordance with this chapter.

Packaging shall not be designed to appeal to persons under 21 years of age.

A retailer shall display a safety information flyer at the point of purchase and offer a customer a copy of the flyer with each purchase. A retailer shall inform the customer that if the customer elects not to receive the flyer, the information contained in the flyer is available on the website for the Board. The flyer shall be developed by the Board in consultation with the Department of Health, posted on the Board’s website, and supplied to the retailer free of charge. At a minimum, the flyer or flyers shall contain information concerning the methods for administering cannabis, the amount of time it may take for cannabis products to take effect, the risks of driving under the influence of cannabis, the potential health risks of cannabis use, the symptoms of problematic usage, how to receive help for cannabis abuse, and a warning that cannabis possession is illegal under federal law.

Internet ordering and delivery of cannabis to customers are prohibited.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. Oct. 7, 2020;

2021, No. 86

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, effective March 25, 2022.

§ 908.
Testing laboratory license.

A testing laboratory licensed under this chapter may acquire, possess, analyze, test, and transport cannabis and cannabis products obtained from a licensed cannabis establishment, dispensary, or a member of the public.

Testing may address the following:

residual solvents;

poisons or toxins;

harmful chemicals;

dangerous molds, mildew, or filth;

harmful microbials, such as E. coli or salmonella;

pesticides; and

tetrahydrocannabinol and cannabidiol potency.

A testing laboratory shall have a written procedural manual made available to employees to follow meeting the minimum standards set forth in rules detailing the performance of all methods employed by the facility used to test the analytes it reports.

In accordance with rules adopted pursuant to this chapter, a testing laboratory shall establish a protocol for recording the chain of custody of all cannabis samples.

A testing laboratory shall establish, monitor, and document the ongoing review of a quality assurance program that is sufficient to identify problems in the laboratory systems when they occur.

A cannabis establishment that is subject to testing requirements under this chapter or rules adopted pursuant to this chapter shall have its cannabis or cannabis products tested by an independent licensed testing laboratory and not a licensed testing laboratory owned or controlled by the license holder of the cannabis establishment.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. Oct. 7, 2020.

§ 909.
Integrated license.

An integrated license shall allow the licensee to engage in the activities of a cultivator, wholesaler, product manufacturer, retailer, and testing laboratory as provided in sections 904-908 of this title.

An integrated license is only available to an applicant and its affiliates that hold a dispensary registration on April 1, 2022. There shall be no more than five total integrated licenses, one for each registered dispensary. Upon compliance with all application procedures and requirements, the Board shall issue an integrated license to the applicant. The licensee shall have the right to renew the license in accordance with rules adopted by the Board.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. Oct. 7, 2020.

§ 910.
Cannabis Establishment fee schedule.

The following fees shall apply to each person or product licensed by the Board:

Cultivators.

Outdoor cultivators.

Outdoor cultivator tier 1. Outdoor cultivators with up to 1,000 square feet of plant canopy or fewer than 125 cannabis plants in an outdoor cultivation space shall be assessed an annual licensing fee of $750.00.

Outdoor cultivator tier 2. Outdoor cultivators with up to 2,500 square feet of plant canopy in an outdoor cultivation space shall be assessed an annual licensing fee of $1,875.00.

Outdoor cultivator tier 3. Outdoor cultivators with up to 5,000 square feet of plant canopy in an outdoor cultivation space shall be assessed an annual licensing fee of $4,000.00.

Outdoor cultivator tier 4. Outdoor cultivators with up to 10,000 square feet of plant canopy in an outdoor cultivation space shall be assessed an annual licensing fee of $8,000.00.

Outdoor cultivator tier 5. Outdoor cultivators with up to 20,000 square feet of plant canopy in an outdoor cultivation space shall be assessed an annual licensing fee of $18,000.00.

Outdoor cultivator tier 6. Outdoor cultivators with up to 37,500 square feet of plant canopy in an outdoor cultivation space shall be assessed an annual licensing fee of $34,000.00.

Indoor cultivators.

Indoor cultivator tier 1. Indoor cultivators with up to 1,000 square feet of plant canopy in an indoor cultivation space shall be assessed an annual licensing fee of $1,500.00.

Indoor cultivator tier 2. Indoor cultivators with up to 2,500 square feet of plant canopy in an indoor cultivation space shall be assessed an annual licensing fee of $3,750.00.

Indoor cultivator tier 3. Indoor cultivators with up to 5,000 square feet of plant canopy in an indoor cultivation space shall be assessed an annual licensing fee of $8,000.00.

Indoor cultivator tier 4. Indoor cultivators with up to 10,000 square feet of plant canopy in an indoor cultivation space shall be assessed an annual licensing fee of $16,000.00.

Indoor cultivator tier 5. Indoor cultivators with up to 15,000 square feet of plant canopy in an indoor cultivation space shall be assessed an annual licensing fee of $36,000.00.

Indoor cultivator tier 6. Indoor cultivators with up to 25,000 square feet of plant canopy in an indoor cultivation space shall be assessed an annual licensing fee of $75,000.00.

Mixed cultivator tiers.

Mixed cultivator tier 1. Mixed cultivators with the following at the same licensed premises shall be assessed an annual licensing fee of $2,250.00: up to 1,000 square feet of plant canopy in an indoor cultivation space and up to 125 cannabis plants in an outdoor cultivation space.

Mixed cultivator tier 2. Mixed cultivators with the following at the same licensed premises shall be assessed an annual licensing fee of $5,625.00: up to 2,500 square feet of plant canopy in an indoor cultivation space and up to 312 cannabis plants in an outdoor cultivation space.

Mixed cultivator tier 3. Mixed cultivators with the following at the same licensed premises shall be assessed an annual licensing fee of $5,500.00: up to 1,000 square feet of plant canopy in an indoor cultivation space and up to 625 cannabis plants in an outdoor cultivation space.

Mixed cultivator tier 4. Mixed cultivators with the following at the same licensed premises shall be assessed an annual licensing fee of $9,500.00: up to 1,000 square feet of plant canopy in an indoor cultivation space and up to 1,250 cannabis plants in an outdoor cultivation space.

Mixed cultivator tier 5. Mixed cultivators with the following at the same licensed premises shall be assessed an annual licensing fee of $19,500.00: up to 1,000 square feet of plant canopy in an indoor cultivation space and up to 2,500 cannabis plants in an outdoor cultivation space.

Wholesalers. Wholesalers shall be assessed an annual licensing fee of $4,000.00.

Manufacturers.

Manufacturer tier 1. Manufacturers that process and manufacture cannabis in order to produce cannabis products without using solvent-based extraction and not more than $10,000.00 per year in cannabis products based on the manufacturer’s total annual sales in cannabis products shall be assessed an annual licensing fee of $750.00.

Manufacturer tier 2. Manufacturers that process and manufacture cannabis in order to produce cannabis products without using solvent-based extraction shall be assessed an annual licensing fee of $2,500.00.

Manufacturer tier 3. Manufacturers that process and manufacture cannabis in order to produce cannabis products using all allowable methods of extraction, including solvent-based extraction, shall be assessed an annual licensing fee of $15,000.00.

Retailers. Retailers that sell cannabis and cannabis products to consumers shall be assessed an annual licensing fee of $10,000.00.

Testing laboratories. Testing laboratories shall be assessed an annual licensing fee of $1,500.00.

Integrated licensees. Integrated licensees shall be assessed an annual licensing fee of $100,000.00.

Employees. Cannabis establishments licensed by the Board shall be assessed an annual licensing fee of $50.00 for each employee.

Products. Retailers and integrated licensees shall be assessed an annual product licensing fee of $50.00 for every type of cannabis and cannabis product that is sold in accordance with this chapter.

Local licensing fees. Cannabis establishments licensed by the Board shall be assessed an annual local licensing fee of $100.00 in addition to each fee assessed under subdivisions (1)–(6) of this section. Local licensing fees shall be distributed to the municipality in which the cannabis establishment is located pursuant to section 846(c) of this title.

One-time fees.

All applicants for a cannabis establishment license shall be assessed an initial one-time application fee of $1,000.00.

An applicant may choose to be assessed an initial one-time intent-to-apply fee of $500.00. If the applicant subsequently seeks a license within one year after paying the intent-to-apply fee, the initial one-time application fee of $1,000.00 shall be reduced by $500.00.

HISTORY:

2021, No. 86

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, effective March 25, 2022.

§ 911.
Fee waiver and reduction; social equity applicants.

The Cannabis Control Board may, in its discretion and pursuant to adopted rule or readily accessible policy, or both, reduce or waive cannabis establishment application and licensing fees for social equity applicants as defined by the Board, including individuals from communities that historically have been disproportionately impacted by cannabis prohibition and individuals directly and personally impacted by cannabis prohibition.

HISTORY:

2021, No. 86

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, effective March 25, 2022.